src/Korektor/sr-Latn.dic
alifatski/744
antivegetativni/745
antikorupcionaški/744
artiljerijski/744
autistični/745,19
bakarnosmeđ/751
baritonski/744
bež/752
bezvrijednostan/753
belobrk/750
belokos/756
belonog/755
besavestan/753
besklasni/745
beskoristan/753
bjelobrad/754
bjelokos/756
blag/755
blagorek/750
blaženopočivši/749
bled/754
bledožut/747
bledosmeđ/751
bojev/748,19
bojkotni/745
bos/756
brzonog/755
brujeći/749
busovit/747
vanfakultetski/744
variran/746
velečastan/753
velik/750,19
vehementni/745
vijorog/755
vitkonog/755
vjerujući/749
vlasast/747
vodonepropustan/753
vodorastvoriv/748
vojnoobaveštajni/745
vranokos/756
geomehanički/744
glistolik/750
godišnji/749
golobrad/754
golonog/755
gord/754
gorezapočet/747
grabežljiv/748
gustiozni/745
gustokos/756
gustolistan/753
gušterolik/750
darnut/747,19
dvadesettrogodišnji/749
dvogod/754
dvook/750
dvored/754
dvorog/755
debelolistan/753
devetnaestočasovni/745
devetostruk/750
dekoltovan/746
demagnetizujući/749
desetonog/755
deskriptorski/744
dobromisleći/749
dokupljiv/748
dorečen/746,19
dronjast/747
društvenokoristan/753
dubok/750,19
dug/755,19
dugobrad/754
dugovlas/756
dugodelujući/749
dugokos/756
dugonos/756
dugorog/755
đavolik/750
evaluativni/745
egzacerbacioni/744
žurajiv/748
žutokos/756
žutosmeđ/751
zabreknut/747
zagaravljen/746
zagasitosmeđ/751
zalogoprimački/744
zapanjen/746
zasjenut/747
zatajiv/748
začudni/745
zvezdolik/750
zgađan/746
zlatokos/756
zlatorog/755
zlehud/754
zlorek/750
zlohud/754
zmajevit/747
izvinjavajući/749
izvjestan/753,19
izgnječiv/748
izmamljivan/746
irigacioni/744
isključivan/746
ispomognut/747
isporediv/748,19
ispotajni/745
iscepljen/746
jakostan/753
jasnovid/754
jedanaestostruk/750
jednogod/754
jednored/754
jednorog/755
kenjkav/748
kesast/747
kinematički/744
klečeći/749
kolaborativni/745,19
korepetiran/746
koristan/753,19
kos/756
koštunjast/747
krajputaški/744
kratkovek/750
kratkokos/756
kratkonog/755
kržljav/748
krivorog/755
krnjorog/755
kukonos/756
kupast/747
leporek/750
likovni/745,19
limitirajući/749,19
lišajiv/748
lopatičast/747
lud/754
makrometarski/744
mekinjast/747
mekokos/756
mekoustan/753
minimalistični/745
miocenski/744
mlak/750
mlitav/748
monetizovan/746
nag/755
nadahnut/747,19
nalomljen/746
nasamariv/748
natvrd/754
negdanji/749
nepotistički/744
nesprečiv/748
neurokognitivni/745
nefrogen/746
obestan/753
ovoletnji/749
ovostran/746
odnarodiv/748
okruglast/747
okupljen/746
opak/750
oraći/749
osmosobni/745
osušiv/748,19
otelovljivan/746
otputovali/744
oštrovid/754
petnaestostruk/750
petogodišnji/749
plavokos/756
pluriformni/745
pobrojan/746,19
pobrojiv/748
povijestan/753
pogurnut/747
podsmjevački/744
podug/755
polivan/746,19
polunag/755
polusvestan/753
polutvrd/754
ponajbrži/749
poprek/750
porječiv/748,19
potpisni/745
počastan/753
preblijed/754
predrag/755
predsedavajući/749
preživarski/744,19
prekuđen/746
premilostan/753
premlad/754
preobazriv/748
preokrenut/747,19
prestrog/755
probirljiv/748,19
provožen/746
prozirni/745,19
prosed/754
prošlojesenji/749
prćonos/756
psetolik/750
psihoorganski/744
punomastan/753
rad/754,19
razaslat/747
raznovrstan/753,19
razrođen/746
restitucionalni/745
riđ/751
ritav/748
ropski/744,19
rus/756
sablastan/753
sadašnji/749
samovlastan/753
samouništavajući/749
svakolik/750
sveblag/755
svevlastan/753
svež/752
svetložut/747
svetlosmeđ/751
svijetlosmeđ/751
svilokos/756
svjež/752
svođen/746
sedokos/756
sijed/754
sitni/745
sjedokos/756
skrbnički/744
slobodnomisleći/749
smeđ/751
smeđokos/756
snalažljiv/748,19
stablolik/750
starostan/753
stisnut/747
strog/755
sukuletni/745
supski/744
tamnosmeđ/751
tamošnji/749
tankozid/754
traverziran/746
trinaestospratni/745
trnolik/750
trogod/754
troetnički/744
tuđ/751
Tuzla/726
turnut/747,19
Turska/727
ćutljiv/748,19
Uagadugu/728
ubog/755
uzbunjujući/749
unakrstan/753
uozbiljen/746,19
fibrocistični/745
Fidži/729
forenzički/744,19
Francuska/730
frljnut/747
Havaji/731
Hale/732
Hercegnov/733
Hercegovina/734
Holandija/735
Hrvatska/736
hroptav/748
hud/754
cakleći/749
celishodni/745,19
celomudren/746
cestarski/744
crvenokos/756
crvenolik/750
crvenoprs/756
crnonog/755
Crnotrav/737
četvorored/754
Češka/738
Čibu/739
Čile/732
čovjekolik/750
čupast/747
Švedska/740
širokonos/756
Škotska/741
Šolaji/731
Španija/742
Šumadija/743
